District of Columbia statutes.
47-1705

Repealed

Distraint of personal property — Persons required to exhibit books.

Repealed.

Aug. 17, 1937, 50 Stat. 674, ch. 690, title I, § 5
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-212, § 18(d), 34 DCR 850
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254,§ 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(v)(2), 48 DCR 334
1981 Ed., § 47-1705.
1973 Ed., § 47-1405.
Section 410(e) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(b), (d), (f), (l), (n), (o), (r), (v), (x)through (aa), (cc), (ff), (gg), (ll), (pp), (vv), (ww), (aaa), (ccc), (eee), and (ggg) shall apply as of January 1, 2001.”